Utah statutes.
17B-1-628.   Certification of resolution setting levy.

The district clerk, as appointed under Section 17B-1-631, shall certify the resolution setting the levy to the county auditor, or auditors if the district is located in more than one county, in accordance with Section 59-2-912, or in the case of a tax rate increase in excess of the certified rate, in accordance with Section 59-2-920.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

